Utah statutes.
17-30-8.   Preservation and inspection of examination papers.

All examination papers shall remain the property of the commission, and shall be preserved until the expiration of the eligible register for the preparation of which an examination is given.  Examination papers are not open to public inspection without court order, but an applicant may inspect the applicant's own papers at any time within 30 days after the mailing of notice of the applicant's grade.  The appointing authority may inspect the papers of any eligible applicant certified for appointment.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

